North Carolina, session 2025, SB590.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality, Division of Coastal Management, the sum of one million seven hundred
ten thousand dollars ($1,710,000) in recurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to be used for the following purposes:
(1) To provide funding for two full-time positions to staff the Resilient Coastal
Communities Program.
(2) To provide grant funding, including federal match funding, and technical
assistance for targeted projects designed to reduce flood risk and promote
long-term resilience.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality, Division of Coastal Management, the sum of four hundred seventy
thousand dollars ($470,000) in recurring funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to provide funding for five full-time positions to staff the Coastal Habitat Assessment
Program.
SECTION 1.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality the sum of nine hundred ninety thousand dollars ($990,000) in recurring
funds for each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to provide funding for six full-time
positions to continue implementation of the Flood Resiliency Blueprint described in Section
5.9(c) of S.L. 2021-180, as amended.
SECTION 1.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality (the "Department") the sum of one million two hundred ten thousand
dollars ($1,210,000) in recurring funds and five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide funding for eight full-time positions
to (i) offer relevant technical assistance to the business community in dealings with the
Department, (ii) assist in grant administration for recycling industry growth, and (iii) provide
improved customer service in the Department's regional offices.
SECTION 1.(e) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality, Division of Marine Fisheries, the sum of six hundred thousand dollars
($600,000) in recurring funds and ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to provide funding for five full-time marine patrol officer positions.
SECTION 1.(f) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality, Division of Air Quality, the sum of four hundred thousand dollars
*S590-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
($400,000) in recurring funds each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and five hundred
fifty thousand dollars ($550,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide
funding for three full-time positions to staff the mobile air quality monitoring unit.
SECTION 1.(g) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality the sum of three million one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,150,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to fund overtopping studies for all remaining
high and intermediate hazard dams in the State, in accordance with G.S. 143-215.32A.
SECTION 1.(h) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used for the ten percent (10%) cost-share
required for Superfund cleanups on the National Priority List sites and to pay the operating and
maintenance costs associated with those Superfund cleanups.
SECTION 1.(i) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality (the "Department") the sum of four million ten thousand dollars
($4,010,000) in recurring funds each fiscal year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium and five
hundred ninety thousand dollars ($590,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year
to provide funding for 24 full-time positions to assist the Department in addressing the emerging
compounds (including PFAs) issue in the State.
SECTION 1.(j) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Environmental Quality the sum of two billion dollars ($2,000,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the Water Infrastructure Fund to be allocated to the Drinking Water
Reserve and the Wastewater Reserve to provide project construction grants for public water
systems and wastewater systems. The limits set forth in G.S. 159G-36(c) shall not apply to grants
awarded from funds allocated by this subsection.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 590-First Edition